Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Legal Actions and Liens.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 780-802.

85 C.J.S., Taxation, §§ 1109, 1130-1136, 1160 et seq.

Sufficiency of designation of taxpayer in recorded notice of federal tax lien. 3 ALR3d 633.

Constitutional provision against imprisonment for debt as applicable to nonpayment of tax. 48 ALR3d 1324.

Property owner’s liability for unpaid taxes following acquisition of property by another at tax sale. 100 ALR3d 593.

Special bank deposits as subject of attachment or garnishment to satisfy depositor’s general obligations. 8 ALR4th 998.

Estoppel of state or local government in tax matters. 21 ALR4th 573.

Sec. 43.10.010.
Attorney general to prosecute violation of revenue laws.

The attorney general shall prosecute every civil and criminal action growing out of state revenue laws. The costs of the action shall be paid out of the proper appropriation for the Department of Law.

The attorney general with the approval of the commissioner may retain the services of attorneys to assist in the collection of revenue where it is necessary to prosecute an action for the collection of the revenue or make efforts to collect revenue outside the state. The commissioner may compensate the attorneys on a direct fee or contingent fee basis at a rate that the commissioner considers fair and reasonable. If the compensation is for a direct fee the commissioner shall pay for the services from the proper appropriation for the Department of Revenue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1960)

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 780-802.

Retailer’s failure to pay to government sales or use tax funds as constituting larceny or embezzlement. 8 ALR4th 1068.

Standing of one taxpayer to complain of underassessment or nonassessment of property of another for state and local taxation. 9 ALR4th 428.

Sec. 43.10.015.
Bad checks.

If a check or money order is presented to the department in payment of any amount due, and is not paid when presented to the payor, there shall be paid as a penalty by the person who tendered the check or money order, upon notice and demand by the commissioner or a delegate, the sum of $10 or an amount equal to one percent of the amount of the check or money order, whichever is greater.
This penalty is in addition to other penalties provided by law and is applicable each time the check or money order is presented to the department or the department is requested by the person tendering the check or money order to present it to the payor.
This section does not apply if the person tendered the check in good faith and with reasonable cause to believe that it would be duly paid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 217 SLA 1970)

Sec. 43.10.020.
Disposition of money collected from actions.

All money derived from civil and criminal actions growing out of state revenue laws shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 127 SLA 1960)

Sec. 43.10.030.
Distraint on property extended to all state revenue statutes.

The remedy of distraint on property, set out in AS

43.20.270

, applies to all state revenue statutes existing or hereafter enacted for the collection of taxes and license fees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1976)

Sec. 43.10.032.
Debt to state; enforcement.

Each of the following is a debt to the state:

a tax levied under this title that is due and unpaid;

the interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to a tax under (1) of this subsection;

a tax levied under this title that has been erroneously refunded; and

the interest, penalty, additional amount or addition to a tax that has been erroneously refunded.

A debt under (a) of this section may be

collected by lien foreclosure; or

recovered in a civil action brought by the state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1980)

Sec. 43.10.035.
Lien.

If a person who is liable to pay a tax or license fee under this title neglects or refuses to pay the tax or license fee after demand, the amount, including interest, additional amount, or assessable penalty, together with costs, is a lien in favor of the state upon all property and right to property, real or personal, belonging to that person.

Unless specifically provided otherwise by law, the lien imposed by this section arises at the time the assessment is made and continues until the amount assessed is paid or a judgment against the taxpayer arising out of the liability is satisfied.

History.

(§ 3 ch 94 SLA 1976)

Sec. 43.10.037.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 43.10.040.
Recording and filing of state tax liens. [Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.10.042.
Recording lien and certificate of discharge.

A lien imposed under AS

43.10.010

—

43.10.060

is not valid as against a mortgagee or other lien holder, pledgee, purchaser, or judgment creditor until notice of it is recorded in the records of the recording district where the property subject to the lien is situated. However, regardless of the date the liens are recorded, a lien arising out of a tax due under AS 43.56 and 43.75, including the penalties and interest on the tax, is a lien prior, paramount, and superior to all other liens, mortgages, hypothecations, conveyances, and assignments, upon all the real and personal property of the person liable for the tax, and upon all the real and personal property used with the permission of the owner to carry on the business that is subject to the tax.

AS

40.19.040

applies to a notice of state tax lien and documents relating to a state tax lien as well as to a notice of federal lien and documents relating to a federal lien.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 39 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 43.10.045.
Suspension of licenses.

In addition to the other penalties imposed in this title, if a person who is authorized to conduct a business by a license issued under the laws of the state fails to pay a tax levied under this title, the license of the person is suspended until the tax imposed by this title, together with interest and penalties, is paid in full.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1980)

Sec. 43.10.050.
Contents of index. [Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.10.060.
Use as evidence.

The recording of a state tax lien certified by the recorder is evidence in all courts in the state and has the same effect as the original.

History.

(§ 3 ch 7 SLA 1957)